Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BLOOMING PRAIRIE; CONTAMINATION REMEDIATION IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $3,909,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to the city of Blooming Prairie to design, construct, reconstruct, and equip capital improvements along the Trunk Highway 218 corridor within the Blooming Prairie city limits to address soil and groundwater contamination. This appropriation includes money for the removal, replacement, and remediation of contaminated soil; and the replacement and rehabilitation of wastewater, drinking water, and other public utility infrastructure within the project area. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $3,909,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end